Utah statutes.
13-1-4.   Centralization of duties.

The department shall centralize the duties and responsibilities of its divisions and agencies in order to:

(1)  reduce and avoid duplication;

(2)  provide efficient planning and management services; and

(3)  maximize utilization of resources.

